North Dakota, session 69, SB2164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 6-08.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
6-08.1-03. Duty of confidentiality.
A financial institution may not disclose customer information to a person, governmental agency, or
law enforcement agency unless the disclosure is made in accordance with any of the following:
1. Pursuant to consent granted by the customer in accordance with this chapter.
2. To a person other than a governmental agency or law enforcement agency pursuant to valid
legal process.
3. To a governmental agency or law enforcement agency pursuant to valid legal process in
accordance with this chapter.
4. For the purpose of reporting a suspected violation of the law in accordance with this chapter.
5. For the purpose of notifying the agriculture commissioner a financial institution has notified a
customer of the availability of the North Dakota mediation service.
6. As part of the disclosure made of deposits of public corporations with financial institutions in
the security pledge schedule verified by the custodian of securities pursuant to section
21-04-09.
7. For purposes of reporting suspected exploitation of an eligible adult as defined by section
12.1-31-07. This subsection may not be construed to impose a duty on a financial institution to
investigate an alleged or suspected exploitation of an eligible adult or to make a report to a
governmental agency or law enforcement agency.
8. For purposes of reporting suspected financial exploitation of an eligible adult under chapter
6-08.5 to a law enforcement agency, the protection and advocacy project under chapter
25 - 01.3 , or the department of health and human services. This subsection may not be
construed to impose a duty on a financial institution to investigate a suspected financial
exploitation of an eligible adult or to make a report to the department of health and human
services or, law enforcement agency, or the protection and advocacy project.

S. B. NO. 2164 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2164.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State